North Carolina, session 2025, HB54.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, the sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) in
recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be allocated as a grant to the
North Carolina Association of People Supporting Employment First (NC APSE) to develop and
implement training programs for the Department, including online training modules, on the
provision of evidence-based supported employment services for individuals in targeted
populations, in order to assist these individuals with preparation for, identification of, and
maintenance of integrated, paid, competitive employment. The Department shall make these
training programs available throughout the State to (i) employers that have hired or are willing
to hire individuals in targeted populations, (ii) service providers of local management
entities/managed care organizations, and (iii) any other entity the Department determines will
benefit from receiving this training in order to achieve improved employment outcomes for
individuals in targeted populations. As used in this section, "individuals in targeted populations"
means individuals with serious mental illness who are not in or at risk of entry into an adult care
home and individuals with intellectual disabilities, developmental disabilities, or both.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H54-v-1*